North Dakota, session 69, SB2272.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 21-10-06 of the North Dakota Century
Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
1. Subject to the provisions of section 21-10-02, the board shall invest the following
funds:
a. State bonding fund.
b. Teachers' fund for retirement.
c. State fire and tornado fund.
d. Workforce safety and insurance fund.
e. Public employees retirement system.
f. Insurance regulatory trust fund.
g. State risk management fund.
h. Budget stabilization fund.
i. Water projects stabilization fund.
j. Health care trust fund.
k. Cultural endowment fund.
l. Petroleum tank release compensation fund.
Page No. 1 25.1217.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
m. Legacy fund.
n. Legacy earnings fund.
o. Opioid settlement fund.
p. Insurance incentive fund.
q. A fund under contract with the board pursuant to subsection 3.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Subsection 3 of section 26.1-01-07.1 of the North Dakota
Century Code is amended and reenacted as follows:
3. Except as otherwise provided by law, after the fiscal year has been closed and all
expenses relating to the fiscal year have been accounted for, the office of
management and budget shall transfer any fund balance remaining in the insurance
regulatory trust fund that exceeds one million dollars to the general fundinsurance
incentive fund.
SECTION 3. A new chapter to title 26.1 of the North Dakota Century Code is created and
enacted as follows:
Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
1. "Fund" means the North Dakota insurance incentive fund.
2. "Net written premiums" means the total premiums, exclusive of assessments and
other charges, paid by policyholders to insurers for policies that comply with this
chapter, minus any return premiums or other premium credits due to policyholders.
3. "Program" means the North Dakota insurance incentive program.
North Dakota insurance incentive program creation - Administration.
1. The North Dakota insurance incentive program is hereby created for the purpose of
providing grants to insurers to improve the availability and affordability of property
insurance in this state.
2. The commissioner may implement this chapter through public-private partnerships
executed through cooperative endeavors with authorized insurers. The endeavors
may include matching capital fund grants in accordance with this chapter.
3. The commissioner may grant matching capital funds to qualified property insurers from
the fund.
4. The commissioner shall adopt rules to administer and implement the program.
Page No. 2 25.1217.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
North Dakota insurance incentive fund - Continuing appropriation.
There is created in the state treasury an insurance incentive fund. The fund consists of all
money transferred or appropriated to the fund and all interest and earnings upon moneys in the
fund. Moneys in the fund are appropriated to the insurance department on a continuing basis for
the purposes of administering the provisions of this chapter, including to provide grants to
insurers in accordance with this chapter. Except as otherwise provided by law, after the
biennium has been closed and all expenses related to the previous biennium have been
accounted for, the office of management and budget shall transfer any fund balance remaining
in the insurance incentive fund that exceeds twenty million dollars to the general fund.
Grant applications - Limitations.
1. Upon implementation of the program, the commissioner shall issue a public invitation
to insurers to submit grant applications. The commissioner may not allocate an
individual grant of less than two million dollars, nor in excess of ten million dollars in
the initial applications. The commissioner shall allocate twenty percent of the total
amount of funds available for grants to domestic insurers.
2. If all money in the fund is not allocated in response to the first invitation for grant
applications, the commissioner may issue a second invitation for grant applications. In
the second invitation, the commissioner may not allocate an individual grant of less
than two million dollars, nor in excess of ten million dollars. An insurer that has been
allocated a grant in response to the first invitation may apply for an additional grant up
to the ten million dollar limit.
3. If all money in the fund is not allocated in response to the second invitation for grant
applications, the commissioner may issue a third invitation for grant applications. In
the third invitation, the commissioner may not allocate an individual grant of less than
two million dollars, nor in excess of ten million dollars. An insurer that has been
allocated a grant in response to the first or second invitation may apply for an
additional grant up to the ten million dollar limit.
4. The commissioner shall respond to all grant applications received under this chapter.
Any unexpended and unencumbered money in the fund, and any matching capital
grant funds that are not earned under this chapter, must revert to the state general
fund.
Page No. 3 25.1217.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
5. The total amount of funds available for this program is the amount appropriated or
otherwise made available to the fund by the legislative assembly. If the amount
requested in grant applications exceeds the amount of funds available, the
commissioner may prioritize and allocate funds among insurers eligible to participate
in the program, considering the financial strength of each insurer and the potential for
the insurer's business plan to improve the availability and affordability of property
insurance in this state.
Minimum capital requirements.
1. The commissioner only may award a grant to an insurer that satisfies minimum capital
requirements under this chapter and any rules adopted by the commissioner, which
must include a capital surplus exceeding ten million dollars, a stable financial condition
as shown by a satisfactory risk-based capital level, and an adequate risk-based
reinsurance program.
2. Matching fund grants may not exceed twenty percent of an insurer's capital and
surplus.
Satisfactory prior experience.
As determined by the commissioner, grants only may be made to insurers with satisfactory
prior experience in writing property insurance or to new insurers with management that has
satisfactory prior experience in writing property insurance.
Authorized insurers.
A surplus lines insurer may apply for a grant under this chapter.
Matching capital fund grants.
1. An insurer shall make a commitment of capital of at least two million dollars to write
property insurance in this state which complies with the requirements of this chapter.
2. Matching capital fund grants authorized under this chapter must match the newly
allocated insurer capital funds at a ratio of one dollar of state capital grant funds to one
dollar of allocated insurer capital funds.
Written premium requirements.
1. To comply with this chapter, new property insurance written by an insurer that received
a matching capital fund grant must be residential, commercial, monoline, or package
property insurance policies in this state, and must include coverage for wind and hail
Page No. 4 25.1217.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
with limits equal to the limits provided for other perils insured under such policies. The
net written premium requirements must be satisfied only by property insurance
coverages reported on the annual statement filed with the commissioner, under certain
lines, as prescribed by the commissioner.
2. Insurers that receive matching capital fund grants shall write property insurance that
complies with the requirements of this chapter with net written premiums of at least a
ratio of two dollars of premium for each dollar of the total of newly allocated insurer
capital and the matching capital fund grant.
3. a. The commissioner shall adopt rules to establish procedures to monitor the net
written premium of insurers receiving any grant under this chapter. The rules
must include provisions for the return of grant money to the state, on a pro rata
basis, for failure to meet the requirements of this chapter. Notwithstanding any
other provision in this chapter, the commissioner shall seek return of unearned
grant money from any insurer that has not complied with the provisions of this
chapter for five consecutive years.
b. Notwithstanding any other provision in this chapter, the rules adopted by the
commissioner must provide that grants made following a third invitation for grant
applications may be made to insurers providing coverage against damage to an
existing dwelling, but only to those policies transferred from an existing dwelling
to a new dwelling, provided the risk of catastrophe associated with the new
dwelling is equal to or greater than the level of risk of catastrophe associated with
the existing dwelling.
c. Grants also may be made to any insurer that was forced to reduce coverage, or
drop coverage entirely, on existing dwellings so the insurer maintains its financial
stability or solvency. A grant made under this subdivision is contingent on the
insurer reinstating the former coverage or better coverage on the existing
dwellings.
Earned capital.
1. An insurer awarded a matching capital fund grant under this chapter shall receive the
grant funds in the amount of twenty percent of the total awarded amount per year, for
Page No. 5 25.1217.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
each year the insurer maintains the net written premiums in accordance with this
chapter, for period not to exceed five years.
2. If an insurer fails to comply with the requirements of this chapter at the end of any year
of the grant, the commissioner may grant an extension if the insurer shows promise of
future compliance.
3. If the commissioner finds an insurer has failed to comply with the statutory or
regulatory requirements for the grant, the commissioner may declare the insurer in
default. An insurer in default shall repay any matching capital fund grant funds that
have not been earned under this section, plus legal interest from the date of the
commissioner's default declaration.
4. In the event of insolvency of an insurer, the North Dakota insurance guaranty
association does not have an obligation to repay matching capital fund grants.
SECTION 4. EXEMPTION - INSURANCE PREMIUM TAX DEPOSITS. Notwithstanding the
provisions of subsection 1 of section 26.1-03-17 relating to the requirement to deposit excess
insurance premium tax collections in the general fund, $20,000,000 of the insurance premium
tax collections must be deposited by the insurance commissioner in the insurance incentive
fund before any deposits in the general fund, during the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, and
ending June 30, 2027.
Page No. 6 25.1217.02000